vec_IT/vec_IT.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi -ér inregolari ((des|re)(c|ti?)oler, (mal|re)voler)
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2c2c3c4P0P1P2
# themeT8 + o/a0a1a2c2c3c4FSI0
SFX c4 Y 18
SFX c4 er éndoƚo/P8 er
SFX c4 er éntomeƚo/P8 er
SFX c4 er éntoƚo/P8 er
SFX c4 ƚer rave-ƚo/A1 oƚer
SFX c4 ƚer reƚo/A1 oƚer
SFX c4 ƚer rà-ƚo/A1 oƚer
SFX c4 ƚer ràe-ƚo/A1 oƚer
SFX c4 ƚer ràeƚo/A1 oƚer
SFX c4 ƚer ràveƚo/A1 oƚer
SFX c4 ƚer ríe-ƚo/A1 oƚer
SFX c4 ƚer ríeƚo/A1 oƚer
SFX c4 ƚer ríseƚo/I9 oƚer
SFX c4 ƚer rónmeƚo/P8 oƚer
SFX c4 ƚo ge-ƚo/A1 [cit]òƚo
SFX c4 ƚo geƚo/A1 [cit]òƚo
SFX c4 ƚo gi-ƚo/A1 [cit]òƚo
SFX c4 ƚo gimeƚo/P8 [cit]òƚo
SFX c4 ƚo giƚo/P8 [cit]òƚo


# vèrbi -<is>ír
# themeT1 + ir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2
SFX d0 Y 243
SFX d0 ir arane/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir aratu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir arave/P3 ir	ts:conditional_present
SFX d0 ir aremo/P0I0 ir
SFX d0 ir aren/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir arene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir arense ir
SFX d0 ir arensi ir
SFX d0 ir aresi/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir aresiu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir arion/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir arione/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir arionse ir
SFX d0 ir arisen/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir arisene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir arisense ir
SFX d0 ir arisensi ir
SFX d0 ir arisi/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir arision/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir arisione/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir arisionse ir
SFX d0 ir arisiu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir arisié/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir arisiéu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir arison/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir arisone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir arisonse ir
SFX d0 ir arié/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir ariéu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir aron/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir arone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir aronse ir
SFX d0 ir arà/P3I0I2 ir
SFX d0 ir aràe/P3 ir	ts:conditional_present
SFX d0 ir aràvene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir arè/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir arène/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir aré/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir arémoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir arémome/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir arémomene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir arésimo/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir arésimoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir arésitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir aréu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir aría/I0I2 ir
SFX d0 ir arèe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX d0 ir aríane/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir aríatu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir aríe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX d0 ir aríene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir arísitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir arò/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir aròe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir en/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir endo/P0 ir	ts:gerund_simple
SFX d0 ir ene/I1 ir	ts:indicative_future is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir ense ir	ts:indicative_imperfect ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX d0 ir ente/M0Ᵽd ir	ts:participle_active
SFX d0 ir ènte/M0 ir	ts:participle_active
SFX d0 ir erane/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir eratu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir erave/P3 ir	ts:conditional_present
SFX d0 ir eremo/P0I0 ir
SFX d0 ir eren/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir erene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir erense ir
SFX d0 ir erensi ir
SFX d0 ir eresi/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir eresiu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir erion/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir erione/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir erionse ir
SFX d0 ir erisen/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir erisene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir erisense ir
SFX d0 ir erisensi ir
SFX d0 ir erisi/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir erision/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir erisione/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir erisionse ir
SFX d0 ir erisiu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir erisié/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir erisiéu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir erison/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir erisone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir erisonse ir
SFX d0 ir erié/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir eriéu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir eron/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir erone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir eronse ir
SFX d0 ir erà/P3I0I2 ir
SFX d0 ir eràe/P3 ir	ts:conditional_present
SFX d0 ir eràvene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir erè/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir erène/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir eré/I4 ir
SFX d0 ir erémoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir erémome/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir erémomene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir erésimo/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir erésimoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir erésitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir eréu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir ería/I0I2 ir
SFX d0 ir erèe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX d0 ir eríane/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir eríatu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir eríe/P3I0I2 ir
SFX d0 ir eríene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir erísitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir erò/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir eròe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir ese/M0 ir
SFX d0 ir esto/A1 ir
SFX d0 ir eva/P3I0I4 ir
SFX d0 ir eve/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir evi/I0I2I4 ir
SFX d0 ir evo/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir èva/P3I0I4 ir
SFX d0 ir ève/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir èvi/I0I2I4 ir
SFX d0 ir èvo/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir on/P0I0 ir
SFX d0 ir one/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir onme/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir é/P3 ir
SFX d0 ir éa/P3I0I4 ir
SFX d0 ir éane/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir éau/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir ée/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir éene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir éi/I0I2I4 ir
SFX d0 ir éimo/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir éimoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir éitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir éndome/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir éndomene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir éntome/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir éntomene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir éo/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir éone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir ésimo ir
SFX d0 ir évane/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir évau/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir évene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir évimo/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir évimoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir évitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir évone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir í/P3I4 ir
SFX d0 ir ía/P3I0I4 ir
SFX d0 ir èe/P3I0I4 ir
SFX d0 ir íane/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir íau/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir íe/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir íene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir íi/I0I2I4 ir
SFX d0 ir íimo/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir íimoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir íitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir ímoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir índome/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir índomene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir íntome/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir íntomene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ío/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir íone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir ísai ir
SFX d0 ir ísame/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ísamene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ísane/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir ísei ir
SFX d0 ir íseme/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ísemene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ísene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir ísime/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ísimene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ísimo ir
SFX d0 ir ísine/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir ísitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir ísoe/M0 ir
SFX d0 ir ísome/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ísomene/P6 ir
SFX d0 ir ísone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir íu/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir ívane/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir ívau/I5 ir
SFX d0 ir ívene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir ívimo/I0 ir
SFX d0 ir ívimoe/I1 ir
SFX d0 ir ívitu/I3 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir ívone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 ir ónmene/P6 ir
SFX d0 r do/A1 ir
SFX d0 r ede/I4 [^cijɉñ]ir	ts:subjunctive_present
SFX d0 r ege/I4 [^cijɉñ]ir	ts:subjunctive_present
SFX d0 r ente/M0Ᵽd [^cijɉñ]ir	ts:participle_active
SFX d0 r ènte/M0 [^cijɉñ]ir	ts:participle_active
SFX d0 r mo/P0I0 ir
SFX d0 r n/I0 ir
SFX d0 r nsi ir	ts:indicative_imperfect ts:subjunctive_imperfect
SFX d0 r on/P0I0 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX d0 r one/I1 [^cijɉñ]ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 r onme/P6 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX d0 r sa/P0 ir
SFX d0 r se/P0P3I0 ir
SFX d0 r sede/I4 ir
SFX d0 r sege/I4 ir
SFX d0 r sen/I0 ir
SFX d0 r sene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 r sense ir
SFX d0 r sensi ir
SFX d0 r si/P0P3I2 ir
SFX d0 r siede/I4 ir
SFX d0 r siege/I4 ir
SFX d0 r sion/I0 ir
SFX d0 r sione/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 r sionse ir
SFX d0 r sié/I4 ir
SFX d0 r siu/I5 ir
SFX d0 r so/P0I0 ir
SFX d0 r son/I0 ir
SFX d0 r sone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 r sonse ir
SFX d0 r sé/I4 ir
SFX d0 r séu/I5 ir
SFX d0 r ven/I0 ir
SFX d0 r vene/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 r vense ir
SFX d0 r vensi ir
SFX d0 r vion/I0 ir
SFX d0 r vione/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 r vionse ir
SFX d0 r vié/I4 ir
SFX d0 r viéu/I5 ir
SFX d0 r von/I0 ir
SFX d0 r vone/I1 ir	is:interrogative
SFX d0 r vonse ir
SFX d0 r é/I4 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX d0 r éu/I5 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX d0 r ónmene/P6 [^cijɉñ]ir
