vec_IT/vec_IT.dic
inasprir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
xbaldir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
bastir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2+0-1r5	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inberir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inbirir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
perboɉir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2.0r0r5	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
borir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2@0*0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
brustolir/a0a1d0d1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inbulir/a0a1d0d1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
intardir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
dolŧir/a0a1d0d1P0P1+0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inđanđir/a0a1d0d1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inđentilir/a0a1d0d1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
rinxovenir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
exebir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
infatir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
profarir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2+0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
fardir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2*0r0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
infisir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
infrapoƚir/a0a2d0d2P0P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
fuxir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2.0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
ingañoƚir/a0a2d0d2P0P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
garofoƚir/a0a2d0d2P0P2+0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
xgrandir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
agredir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
ingringoƚir/a0a2d0d2P0P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
ingritoƚir/a0a2d0d2P0P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
grixoƚir/a0a2d0d2P0P2+0*0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
gruñir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inibir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2r2r3	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
insipidir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inɉandolir/a0a1d0d1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
xjonfir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inkalir/a0a1d0d1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inkandir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
kapir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2^6r0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inkasir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
kolorir/a0a1d0d1P0P1+0-1*0V0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inkoraɉir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
krostoƚir/a0a2d0d2P0P2+0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
intarkuirir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
xlangolir/a0a1d0d1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
iƚanguidir/a0a2d0d2P0P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
ƚestir/a0a2d0d2P0P2@0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
lexierir/a0a1d0d1P0P1+0*0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
xlixarir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
xmagrir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
marsir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2+0*0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
xmentir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
xminuir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
morbidir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2+0@0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inmuxonir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
norir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2+0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
oƚir/a0a2d0d2P0P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inpadronir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
pasir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2+0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inpeltrir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inparsutir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
pikoƚir/a0a2d0d2P0P2+0*0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
sponxoƚir/a0a2d0d2P0P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
spusolir/a0a1d0d1P0P1	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
raxir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2r5	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
risoƚir/a0a2d0d2P0P2+0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
roñir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
ruñir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
saurir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2+0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inserir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2r0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
sopir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
staƚir/a0a2d0d2P0P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
konstituir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2r2r3	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
stransir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2r5	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
stuƚir/a0a2d0d2P0P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
insukir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2r0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
toƚer/a0a2c2c4P0P2-1.0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
tioƚer/a0a2c2c4P0P2-1.0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
coƚer/a0a2c2c4P0P2-1.0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
tondir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
ŧensir/a0a1d0d1P0P1r0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
insipidir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
unir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2.0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
vartir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2+0@0:0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
voƚer/a0a2c2c4P0P2‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
vuoƚer/a0a2c2c4P0P2‘0.0^7^8	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
inxarir/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
